New York, session 2025-2026, A10540.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 29-b of the executive law, as 2 amended by section 7 of part B of chapter 56 of the laws of 2010, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. State use of disaster emergency response personnel and non-state 5 resource providers. a. The governor may, in [his or her] their 6 discretion, direct the state disaster preparedness commission to conduct 7 an emergency exercise or drill, under its direction, in which all or any 8 of the personnel and resources of the agencies of the commission of the 9 state may be utilized to perform the duties assigned to them in a disas- 10 ter, for the purpose of protecting and preserving human life or property 11 in a disaster. During a disaster or such drill or exercise, disaster 12 emergency response personnel in the state shall operate under the direc- 13 tion and command of the chair of such commission, and shall possess the 14 same powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities as are applicable 15 in a civil defense drill held at the direction of the state civil 16 defense commission under the provisions of the New York state defense 17 emergency act. 18 b. The governor may deploy non-state resource providers to another 19 compact member jurisdiction under any compact in this article. When 20 authorized to provide assistance and deployed by the legally designated 21 state official or officials, non-state resource providers shall be 22 deemed agents of the state for purposes of the deployment and shall be 23 entitled to the rights and benefits provided to state resource providers 24 by the compact, subject to any terms and conditions of the requesting 25 state. Non-state resource providers shall not offer assistance to, or 26 request assistance from, another compact member jurisdiction. The divi- 27 sion of homeland security and emergency services shall serve as the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15185-02-6 A. 10540 2 1 coordinator for offers and requests for assistance and facilitator of 2 the reimbursement of non-state resource providers by the requesting 3 state. The division of homeland security and emergency services shall 4 not be responsible for reimbursement until the division receives payment 5 from the requesting compact member jurisdiction. 6 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 29-k to read 7 as follows: 8 § 29-k. Northern emergency management assistance compact. Notwith- 9 standing any other law, the state, through the governor, may enter the 10 northern emergency management assistance compact (P.L. 112-282, ratified 11 by Congress on January fourteenth, two thousand thirteen). Such compact 12 shall be deemed ratified by the legislature upon the governor's certif- 13 ication to the temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the 14 assembly, and the secretary of state, that New York has entered into the 15 compact. 16 § 3. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 29-l to read 17 as follows: 18 § 29-l. International Emergency Management Assistance Compact. 19 Notwithstanding any other law, the state, through the governor, may 20 enter the compact established by the emergency management assistance 21 memorandum of understanding (executed on July eighteenth, two thousand 22 by the states of Connecticut, Maine, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, Rhode 23 Island, and Vermont and the Canadian provinces of New Brunswick, 24 Newfoundland, Nova Scotia, Prince Edward Island, and Quebec) at the 25 twenty-fifth conference of New England Governors and Eastern Canadian 26 Premiers, as authorized by Article II(j) of the Agreement between the 27 Government of the United States and the Government of Canada on Cooper- 28 ation in Comprehensive Emergency Planning and Management renewed on 29 December second, nineteen ninety-eight. Such compact shall be deemed 30 ratified by the legislature upon the governor's certification to the 31 temporary president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, and the 32 secretary of state, that New York has entered into the compact. 33 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.